Utah statutes.
10-1-101.   Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Utah Municipal Code." In enacting this code, it is the legislative intent to repeal only those provisions of Utah law set forth in Section 10-1-114. It is the legislative intent to review, modernize and incorporate into this code in later sessions other provisions of Utah law relating to municipalities not included in this act. Provisions of Utah law not specifically repealed shall continue in effect.

